test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tasoTS_gt-norm.yaml
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тасон
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тасод
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тасода
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тасониʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тасодиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тасодиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тасонаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тасодаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тасодоʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тасонась
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тасодась
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тасодась
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тасонинзь
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тасодинзь
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тасодинзь
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тасонаць
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тасодаць
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тасодонзь
     таˮ+N+Tra: таˮӈэ
     таˮ+N+Car: тациˮ
     таˮ+N+Equ: татремʼ
     таˮ+N+Equ+Lat: татревʼ
